District of Columbia statutes.
10-166

Transfers and jurisdiction.

(a)

Pursuant to § 1-204.04(b), jurisdiction over all public space park areas, maintained by the Department of Public Works before July 1, 1989, shall be transferred to and become the responsibility of the Department of Parks and Recreation. For purposes of this section, the phrase “all public space park areas” (“parks”) includes all parcels, lots, squares of land, green spaces, and monuments located within and owned or maintained by the District of Columbia government and not owned or maintained by the federal government.

(b)

The Department of Public Works, Division of Roadside and Parks Maintenance, shall retain jurisdiction over, and responsibility for maintenance, landscaping, beautifying, promoting, and regulation of roadsides, interstate gateways, and cloverleafs.

(c)

The Facility Maintenance Administration within the Department of Parks and Recreation shall have jurisdiction over, and be responsible for the maintenance, landscaping, beautifying, promotion, and regulation of the parks transferred pursuant to this section.

(d)

Funds and existing continuing full-time employees and positions authorized for the Department of Public Works, Division of Roadside and Parks Maintenance (Responsibility Center 4044) within the Public Space Administration (Control Center 40) in the Fiscal Year 1989 Budget for the District of Columbia and allocated for the maintenance, landscaping, beautifying, promotion, and regulation of parks transferred pursuant to this section, shall be transferred to the Department of Recreation, Facility Maintenance Administration (Responsibility Center 2700) within Recreation Operations (Control Center 20).

(e)

The Facility Maintenance Administration (Responsibility Center 2700) within Recreation Operations (Control Center 20) is renamed the Parks and Facility Maintenance Administration.

(f)

The Department of Recreation and Parks is renamed the Department of Parks and Recreation.

Mar. 16, 1989, D.C. Law 7-209, § 2, 36 DCR 476
May 2, 2015, D.C. Law 20-271, § 302, 62 DCR 1884
1981 Ed., § 8-166.
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 20-271 substituted “Department of Parks and Recreation” for “Department of Recreation” in (a) and (c); and substituted “Department of Parks and Recreation” for “Department of Recreation and Parks” in (f).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 302 of the New Columbia Statehood Initiative, Omnibus Boards and Commissions, and Election Transition Reform Emergency Amendment Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-481, November 18, 2014, 61 DCR 12133, 20 STAT 4405).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 302 of the New Columbia Statehood Initiative, Omnibus Boards and Commissions, and Election Transition Reform Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-7, Feb. 26, 2015, 62 DCR 2646, 21 STAT 807).
Pursuant to Mayor’s Order 2000-20, the agency formerly known as the Department of Recreation and Parks shall be known as the Department of Parks and Recreation.